orthography/orthography.xfst
! Орфография
define Orthography к ъ -> қ
	.o. н ъ -> ң
	.o. г ъ -> ғ
	.o. о ъ -> ӧ
	.o. у ъ -> ӱ
	.o. k -> қ ! Радлов
	.o. l -> л
	.o. ӓ -> э
	.o. і -> и || C _ C ! кириллическое і
	.o. ј -> й
	.o. џ -> ч
	.o. ō -> о о
	.o. л ь -> л ! <<< Кто?
	.o. я -> а || C _
	.o. я -> й а || V _ , .#. _
	;
